District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1913

Tax not to exceed difference between maximum credit and levy by states

Repealed.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 24, 33 DCR 7008

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 47-1911 to 47-1918.